Utah statutes.
58-37c-13.   License does not authorize possession of controlled substances.

Nothing in the provisions of this chapter shall authorize persons not licensed under provisions of Title 58, Chapter 37, Utah Controlled Substance Act, to distribute, possess, dispense, administer, or otherwise deal in controlled substances as defined in the Utah Controlled Substance Act.

